Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 3 Committees
10-3-504. Acts 1981, No. 975, §§ 1-3; 1983, No. 18, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-304.2—4-304.4; Acts 1989, No. 48, § 1; 1991, No. 295, § 2; 1991, No. 419, §§ 1 and 2; 1991, No. 420, § 1.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning vacancies in Senate positions, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 832, § 3. The section was derived from Acts 1985, No. 224, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-304.6.

Because of some uncertainty as to the legal effect of Acts 1991, No. 832, this section was also repealed by Acts 1993, No. 517, § 6.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning vacancies in House positions, was repealed by Acts 1993, No. 517, § 6. The section was derived from Acts 1979, No. 157, § 1; 1981, No. 939, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-304; Acts 1991, No. 295, § 3.

Regular members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee who are appointed to the Legislative Council shall receive per diem and mileage for attendance at Legislative Council presession budget hearings from funds appropriated for the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee;

Members of either house of the General Assembly who are not regular members of the Legislative Council or regular members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall receive the per diem and mileage from funds appropriated for the payment of per diem and mileage for attendance at meetings of the interim committees of the General Assembly; and

Members of the Legislative Council shall receive per diem and mileage from funds appropriated for the support of the Legislative Council.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 157, § 1; 1981, No. 939, § 1; 1985, No. 224, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-304, 4-304.5; Acts 1991, No. 832, § 1; 1993, No. 393, § 1; 1993, No. 542, § 3; 1995, No. 1312, § 19; 1995, No. 1350, § 4; 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 19; 1997, No. 1285, § 22; 2003, No. 1002, § 2; 2003, No. 1083, § 1; 2003, No. 1091, §§ 3, 4; 2005, No. 2100, § 16; 2007, No. 321, § 3.

10-3-503, 10-3-504. [Repealed.]

10-3-506. [Repealed.]

The members appointed to serve on the Joint Budget Committee at the next-following regular session of the General Assembly who are not members of the Legislative Council shall be privileged to attend all presession budget hearings of the Legislative Council held after the October 1 preceding the next regular session of the General Assembly.

All such members of the Joint Budget Committee who are not regular members of the Legislative Council shall be given notice of all presession budget hearings scheduled by the Legislative Council and shall be privileged to attend the budget hearings and to participate therein and vote on budget recommendations the same as regular members of the Legislative Council.

The members shall be entitled to receive per diem and mileage for attendance at such presession budget hearings of the Legislative Council at the same rates provided by law for attendance at meetings of the interim committees of the General Assembly, and payment therefor shall be made as follows:

The House Chair of the Special Language Subcommittee of the Joint Budget Committee shall serve on the corresponding subcommittee of the Legislative Council and Joint Budget Committee presession budget hearings as an ex officio nonvoting member.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 157, § 1; 1981, No. 939, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-304; Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 17; 2005, No. 2100, § 17.

10-3-508. Duties.

In addition to participation by members of the Joint Budget Committee in the presession budget hearings of the Legislative Council, as authorized in §10-3-507, the Joint Budget Committee during a regular session, a fiscal session, and a special session of the General Assembly shall perform any duties as are provided by the Joint Rules of the House of Representatives and the Senate.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 157, § 1; 1981, No. 939, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-304; Acts 2009, No. 962, § 19.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “Joint Budget Committee during a regular session, fiscal session, and a special session” for “Committee during regular and special sessions.”

10-3-509. Meeting during the interim.

The House of Representatives members of the Joint Budget Committee shall serve as an interim committee to be known as the House Interim Budget Committee.

The Joint Budget Committee and the House Interim Budget Committee shall be authorized to meet during the interim to work on budgetary and other matters as come before the Joint Budget Committee.

The members of the Joint Budget Committee shall be paid per diem and mileage reimbursement from moneys appropriated for the payment of per diem and mileage for members of the General Assembly when attending meetings of interim committees.

Effective Dates. Acts 1967, No. 508, § 7: Apr. 4, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order for the General Assembly to properly perform its duties within the limited time of each Regular Session, adequate specifications and safeguards must be developed to assure the General Assembly of quality printing, with prompt performance under printing contracts, and that in order to establish procedures whereby adequate specifications and safeguards may be incorporated within future printing contracts for legislative requirements, the immediate passage of this act is necessary. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 16, § 5: Feb. 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is immediately necessary to provide for the selection of co-chairmen of the Joint Committee on Legislative Printing Requirements and Specifications and that until this Act becomes effective the selection cannot occur. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 51: Apr. 14, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the method of selection of alternate members of the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and that this act is immediately necessary for proper continuity and efficiency in State government. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1221, § 1; 1997, No. 1354, § 2; 2001, No. 221, § 5.

Subchapter 6

— Joint Committee on Legislative Printing Requirements and Specifications

10-3-601. Intent.

It is the intent of this subchapter to establish procedures whereby the types of contracts to be let for legislative printing or duplicating requirements may be determined after study and review of the printing or duplicating needs of the General Assembly. Adequate specifications and safeguards may be established for such contracts in order that the State Procurement Director might be advised thereof in the letting of contracts for legislative printing or duplicating requirements.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 508, § 4; 1975, No. 544, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-904; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6061.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Office of State Procurement of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “State Procurement Director” in the second sentence.

10-3-602. Creation — Composition.

There is established a joint interim committee of the General Assembly, consisting of the chair and vice chair of the respective efficiency committees of the House of Representatives and Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives or his or her designee, and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, which committee shall be designated and be known as the “Joint Committee on Legislative Printing Requirements and Specifications”.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 508, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-901; Acts 2009, No. 84, § 2.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted “or his or her designee.”

10-3-603. Meetings — Officers — Compensation.

The Joint Committee on Legislative Printing Requirements and Specifications shall meet subsequent to the adjournment of each regular session of the General Assembly, at a time to be determined jointly by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and shall select from its membership two (2) cochairs, one (1) cochair to be a member of the House of Representatives to be elected by the members of the Joint Committee on Legislative Printing Requirements and Specifications who are members of the House and one (1) cochair to be a Senator to be elected by the members of the Joint Committee on Legislative Printing Requirements and Specifications who are members of the Senate.

The Joint Committee on Legislative Printing Requirements and Specifications may elect such other officers as it deems necessary for the performance of its duties.

The two (2) cochairs shall preside at each meeting of the Joint Committee on Legislative Printing Requirements and Specifications or may rotate from meeting to meeting as presiding officers as they determine.

A majority vote of the full membership of the Joint Committee on Legislative Printing Requirements and Specifications shall be necessary to take final action on any matter.

The Joint Committee on Legislative Printing Requirements and Specifications may establish rules for its procedures and shall meet upon call of the cochairs thereof, upon call by a majority of its members, or at other intervals as may be established in its rules.

Members of the Joint Committee on Legislative Printing Requirements and Specifications shall receive per diem for attending meetings of the Joint Committee on Legislative Printing Requirements and Specifications or other official business of the Joint Committee on Legislative Printing Requirements and Specifications at the rate provided by law for attendance by members of the General Assembly at meetings of interim committees and, in addition, shall receive mileage for travel in attending meetings or other official business of the Joint Committee on Legislative Printing Requirements and Specifications at the rate provided by law for state employees.

Per diem and mileage of members of the Joint Committee on Legislative Printing Requirements and Specifications shall be paid from any appropriation made for paying per diem, expenses, and mileage of members of the interim committees.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 508, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-902; Acts 1991, No. 16, § 1; 1997, No. 1354, § 18.

10-3-604. Duties.

It shall be the duty of the Joint Committee on Legislative Printing Requirements and Specifications to:

Study and review all purchases by the General Assembly of printing and duplicating services and stationery;

Designate those items which should be purchased under commercial term contracts awarded by the State Procurement Director, those items which should be purchased under one-time commercial contracts awarded by the director, and those items of printing or duplicating that can be best accomplished by facilities operated by the General Assembly or its staff or by another state agency and paid for on a cost basis through an intergovernmental transfer of funds;

Promulgate standards, specifications, and rules governing the size, composition, and printing or duplicating processes that shall be used in furnishing printing or duplicating services for the General Assembly and certify the specifications and requirements to the director, who shall incorporate the specifications and requirements in contracts to be let for legislative printing needs;

Establish requirements for the furnishing of bonds for performance under legislative printing or duplicating contracts, establish penalty provisions for failure to perform under the terms of the contracts, and establish procedures for the evaluation of performance under those contracts for the purpose of determining when the penalty provisions shall be invoked, and the amount thereof, in case of breach of contract or failures to fulfill contracts within the terms thereof;

Make any additional rules or specifications and advise the director for incorporation in legislative printing or duplicating contracts as the Joint Committee on Legislative Printing Requirements and Specifications determines necessary in order that the efficiency of the General Assembly might be expedited.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (3); and deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (5).

History.

Acts 1967, No. 508, § 3; 1975, No. 544, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-903; Acts 2019, No. 315, §§ 745, 746.

10-3-605. State Procurement Director — Contracts.

The State Procurement Director shall incorporate into all contracts for legislative printing or duplicating requirements the specifications, bond requirements, penalty provisions, and other requirements as may be certified to it by the Joint Committee on Legislative Printing Requirements and Specifications and shall let contracts for legislative printing or duplicating requirements in accordance therewith in the manner now established by law.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 508, § 4; 1975, No. 544, § 14(B); A.S.A. 1947, § 4-904.

Subchapter 7

— Retirement Committees

Cross References. Public employees' retirement system, §24-4-101 et seq.

Public employees' social security, §24-1-201 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1975, No. 289, § 2: Mar. 3, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that each session of the General Assembly considers numerous bills proposing amendments, changes, or additions to the publicly supported retirement systems, and that due to the limitations of the time available during each Regular and Special Session, there are not sufficient opportunities to adequately study and review many aspects of the retirement systems that would be affected by such proposed legislation; and that the establishment of a Joint Interim Committee of the General Assembly to serve as an overview committee over the various retirement systems is essential to the proper functioning of the General Assembly; and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary in order to establish the Joint Interim Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs in order that said committee may enter upon its duties immediately upon adjournment of the Seventieth Session of the General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 964, § 3: became law without Governor's signature, Apr. 8, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the increased work load of the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs makes it necessary to enlarge the membership of said committee in order to provide for larger participation of the members of the House and Senate in the decisions of said committee, and to provide for a more equitable distribution of the work load of said committee, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary in order that the additional members of said Joint Committee may be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Committee on Committees of the Senate to serve during the remainder of the Regular Session of the Seventy-Third General Assembly, and as members of the Joint Interim Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs for the interim between adjournment of the Seventy-Third General Assembly and the convening of the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 517, § 10: Mar. 16, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the laws concerning certain committees of the House of Representatives and the General Assembly are in need of clarification and revision for the efficient operation of the General Assembly and that this act is immediately necessary to assist the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly in carrying out its duties. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 139, § 5: Feb. 2, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs should be composed of an equal number of members in the Arkansas Senate and the Arkansas House of Representatives; that under present law there exist more House members than Senate members; and that this act equalizes the membership of that committee and should be given immediate effect in order to be applicable to the committee meetings of the legislative session now in progress. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 1130, § 5: Apr. 10, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs deals with very complicated and important issues relating to the various public retirement systems; that it is essential that new members appointed to serve on the committee at each regular session of the General Assembly have considerable knowledge concerning the various retirement systems in order to intelligently vote on legislation coming before the committee which may seriously affect the financial well-being of the systems; that with term limits the only practical way to enable future members of the committee to gain the knowledge and experience in retirement matters needed to serve as regular members of the committee is to permit interested House members to serve as non-voting members of the committee during the interim between sessions; and that this act is designed to permit such interim service and should be given effect immediately. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 94, § 5: Feb. 5, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the method prescribed by law for selecting the House cochairman and House co-vice-chairman of the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs violates the rules of the House of Representatives; that the selection of committee officers is an internal affair of the chamber which should be addressed by rule; that the conflicting statutory provision results in confusion and hampers the efficient operation of the House; that this act will eliminate the conflict and make the law compatible with the other laws relating to House committees; that clarification should be accomplished as soon as possible in order to minimize disruption of the operation of the committee during this regular session and hereafter. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 24, § 4: Jan. 29, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the membership of the interim committees addressed by this act should be modified to reflect a better representation of the House and Senate; that this act accomplishes that purpose; that the committees identified by this act may commence meeting immediately upon adjournment of this session, and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, the modification of the membership will not occur for three months after the date of adjournment resulting in either obsolete membership for the first three months of the interim or a three-month delay in the committees commencing their work. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 237, § 2: Mar. 9, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the provisions of §10-3-702(b)(4) and (5) are cumulative to other provisions of Arkansas law, namely §§24-1-104,24-1-105, and24-1-106, which prevent the enactment of a legislated benefit enhancement which would cause a retirement system's unfunded accrued actuarial liabilities to exceed a thirty-year amortization; and that the provisions of §10-3-702(b)(4) constitute an impermissible attempt to dictate the procedural rules of the Eighty-Sixth General Assembly as well as any future General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

10-3-701. Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs — Creation — Members.

There is established a joint committee of the House of Representatives and the Senate to be known as the “Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs”, to consist of twenty (20) members.

The ten (10) House members and ten (10) House alternates shall be selected as prescribed by the Rules of the House of Representatives.

The House Cochair of the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs and House Co-vice Chair of the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs shall be selected in accordance with the Rules of the House of Representatives.

In addition to the regular House members appointed under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint, during each regular session, one (1) additional House member from each caucus district to serve as a nonvoting member of the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs only during the interim between sessions of the General Assembly.

At the commencement of each regular session of the General Assembly, ten (10) members of the Senate shall be named pursuant to the Rules of the Senate to serve on the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs. Vacancies shall be filled pursuant to the Rules of the Senate.

Pursuant to the Rules of the Senate, one (1) Senate member of the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs shall be designated to serve as Senate Cochair of the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs and one (1) Senate member shall be designated to serve as Senate Co-vice Chair of the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs.

If the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs deems it necessary, the services of actuaries may be obtained in evaluating the respective bills, provided that funds have been provided for that purpose.

No bill amending an existing publicly supported retirement system by increasing the multiplier, changing terms of or allowing the purchase of credited service, shortening vesting periods or shortening the years of service required for standard retirement without penalty, or which would establish a new or expanded public retirement program, shall be acted upon in either house until the fiscal note provided for in subsection (a) of this section has been attached to the bill, two-thirds (2/3) of the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs has recommended the passage of the bill, and the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs has reported its recommendations in regard to the bill.

However, upon suspension of the Joint Rules of the House of Representatives and the Senate, a retirement system bill may be withdrawn from further consideration by the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs and may be acted upon without a report of the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs being attached thereto.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment deleted (b)(4) and (b)(5).

Cross References. Fiscal impact statements, §10-2-114.

Upon adjournment of each regular session, fiscal session, and special session of the General Assembly, the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs is designated and constituted as a joint interim committee of the General Assembly to be known as the “Joint Interim Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs”.

The Joint Interim Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs shall consist of the members appointed to the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs during each regular session of the General Assembly, and they shall serve thereon until the next following regular session, at which time all members shall be appointed in the manner provided in § 10-3-701.

The Joint Interim Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs shall make continuing review of the statistics, actuarial solvency, adequacy of benefits, and all other aspects of the publicly supported retirement systems of this state. The Joint Interim Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs shall also study and review all proposals for changes or amendments to any of the existing public retirement laws or for the creation of new or expanded public retirement systems and shall report its findings and recommendations to each session of the General Assembly in regard to each such proposal. Any member of the General Assembly, the boards of trustees and administrators of the publicly supported retirement systems of this state, and any member of any system may present information and request the review by the Joint Interim Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs of proposed changes in the various retirement systems.

The Joint Interim Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs shall periodically report to the Legislative Council on the status of its studies and findings. The Joint Interim Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs shall undertake such special studies as may be referred to the Joint Interim Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs by the Legislative Council and report to the Legislative Council in regard thereto.

In the event a vacancy occurs on the Joint Interim Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as provided in subsection (b) of this section for the original appointment.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “regular session, fiscal session, and special session” for “regular and special session” in (a).

Preambles. Acts 1979, No. 8 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, this nation is facing a severe energy crisis due to the decline of worldwide supplies of petroleum and natural gas; and

“Whereas, Arkansas has long enjoyed limited supplies of natural gas and petroleum, but these reserves are rapidly being depleted and Arkansas, as well as the nation, will be facing an increasing energy problem; and

“Whereas, it is in the public interest that the General Assembly cooperate with the Governor, the appropriate administrative agencies of this state, and appropriate state and federal agencies and the Congress in making continual review of the energy problems and needs, and to explore means by which this state can participate with other states and the federal government in resolving energy problems;

“Now therefore….”

Effective Dates. Acts 1979, No. 8, § 7: Jan. 30, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is a nationwide energy crisis which threatens the economy of this state and of the nation, and poses an immediate and future peril to the health, safety, and welfare of the people of this state, and immediate steps are needed to coordinate the research, planning, and consideration of energy problems and the development of comprehensive and meaningful legislation to deal with these problems, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to enable the Seventy-Second General Assembly to establish a standing committee which will make studies, not only during Regular Sessions of the General Assembly, but in the interim period between Legislative Sessions designed to keep the General Assembly of this state fully in contact with the development of meaningful solutions to the energy problems, and in the development of legislation to carry out such solutions. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 15, § 5: Feb. 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is immediately necessary to provide for the appointment of alternate members of the Joint Committee on Energy and that until this Act becomes effective such appointments cannot be made. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 517, § 10: Mar. 16, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the laws concerning certain committees of the House of Representatives and the General Assembly are in need of clarification and revision for the efficient operation of the General Assembly and that this act is immediately necessary to assist the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly in carrying out its duties. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 51: Apr. 14, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the method of selection of alternate members of the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and that this act is immediately necessary for proper continuity and efficiency in State government. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 24, § 4: Jan. 29, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the membership of the interim committees addressed by this act should be modified to reflect a better representation of the House and Senate; that this act accomplishes that purpose; that the committees identified by this act may commence meeting immediately upon adjournment of this session, and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, the modification of the membership will not occur for three months after the date of adjournment resulting in either obsolete membership for the first three months of the interim or a three-month delay in the committees commencing their work. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 380, § 3: Mar. 17, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Senate Rules adopted for the Eighty-fourth General Assembly provide for ten (10) Senate members on the Joint Committee on Energy and ten (10) Senate members on the Joint Performance Review Committee; that the statutes relating to those committees indicate seven (7) Senate members on each committee; that the statutes further provide that the Senate members are selected according to Senate Rules; that until the statutes are amended, there will be a conflict between the Senate Rules and the statutes; and that it is imperative that the Senate Rules and the statutes not be in conflict. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 74: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act includes technical corrects to Act 923 of 2003 which establishes the classification and compensation levels of state employees covered by the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act; that Act 923 of 2003 will become effective on July 1, 2003; and that to avoid confusion this act must also effective on July 1, 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

History.

Acts 1975, No. 289, § 1; 1981, No. 964, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1101; Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 30, § 1; 1993, No. 517, § 1; 1995, No. 139, § 1; 1995, No. 1130, § 1; 1997, No. 94, § 1; 2001, No. 627, § 2; 2003, No. 24, § 1.

10-3-702. Bills referred to Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs — Fiscal note.

All bills introduced in either house of the General Assembly to amend any of the existing publicly supported retirement systems laws of this state or to establish new or expanded public retirement or social security programs shall be referred to the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs.

(1)The Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs shall cause a fiscal note to be prepared and attached to each bill reflecting estimated cost or fiscal impact of the bill upon the revenues of the State of Arkansas and its various agencies and upon the actuarial soundness of the retirement systems.

(A)In connection with the preparation of the fiscal notes, the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs is authorized to request the respective retirement systems to review proposed retirement bills and to furnish the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs with an evaluation thereof in writing.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 289, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1102; Acts 1995, No. 883, § 1; 1997, No. 93, § 1; 2007, No. 237, § 1.

10-3-703. Joint Interim Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs — Members — Duties.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 289, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1103; Acts 2009, No. 962, § 20.

Subchapter 8

— Energy Committees

10-3-801. Subchapter supplemental.

The provisions of this subchapter shall be in addition and supplemental to the laws of this state and the Rules of the House of Representatives and the Rules of the Senate pertaining to the standing and interim committees of the General Assembly and of the House of Representatives and Senate.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 8, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1205n.